Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1926.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 3505(b)(1) of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended and subsection (a) is amended by adding a paragraph to read:§ 3505. Unlawful use of unmanned aircraft.(a) Offense defined.--A person commits the offense of unlawful use of unmanned aircraft if the person uses an unmanned aircraft intentionally or knowingly to:* * *(4) Cause the unmanned aircraft to enter or remain over the property of another person:(i) to coerce, intimidate, harass or cause annoyance to any person;123456789101112131415161718 (ii) to cause damage to any property; or(iii) in defiance of an order to leave or not enter the property given by actual communication to the offender by the owner of the property, another authorized person or a law enforcement officer.(b) Grading.--The offense of unlawful use of unmanned aircraft shall be graded as follows:(1) An offense under subsection (a)(1) [or (2)], (2) or (4) is a summary offense punishable by a fine of up to $300.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1926PN2406 - 2 - 1234567891011